Illinois, session 104th, SB416.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Student Educational Technology Rights Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Artificial intelligence" has the meaning given to that 8term in Section 2-101 of the Illinois Human Rights Act and 9includes generative artificial intelligence.10    "Student" has the meaning given to that term in the 11Illinois School Student Records Act. 12    Section 10. Artificial intelligence technology policy. By 13the 2027-2028 school year, the school board of each school 14district shall adopt a policy that, at a minimum:15        (1) prohibits teachers from using an artificial 16    intelligence tool to assign a numerical score or a grade 17    for any task that requires professional judgment; and18        (2) requires that any artificial intelligence model 19    used in relation to students or student work be approved 20    by the school district, and requires the school district 21    to provide a list of approved artificial intelligence 22    models to all schools at the start of each school year and   SB0416 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 06654 LNS 16690 b1    promptly after any revisions to the list. 2    Section 90. Construction. Nothing in this Act may be 3construed to conflict with a school district's obligations 4under federal law, including, but not limited to, the federal 5Individuals with Disabilities Education Act and Section 504 of 6the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.